Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 201

General Provisions

48-201-101. Short title.

Chapters 201-248 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act.”

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Law Reviews.

At Last … The Closely-Held Business Entity of Choice is Available in Tennessee, (J. Leigh Griffith), 30 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1994).

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

Gray Power in the Gray Area Between Employer and Employee: The Applicability of the ADEA to Members of Limited Liability Companies, 51 Vand. L. Rev. 429 (1998).

Key Tax Aspects of the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, (Andrhe Sophia Blumstein), 30 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1994).

“Limited Liability Companies” Bill Passes, 30 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1994).

Punitive Damages and Business Organizations: A Pathetic Fallacy, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 971 (2000).

The Proposed Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 491 (1994).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 2, 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of corporate campaign contribution prohibitions to limited liability companies, OAG 98-053, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53, (3/2/98).

48-201-102. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of chapters 201-248 of this title at any time and all domestic and foreign LLCs subject to chapters 201-248 of this title shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-201-103. Applicability.

Chapters 201-248 of this title apply to every LLC for profit now existing or hereafter formed, and to the outstanding and future interests in such LLCs; provided, that if there are other specific statutory provisions which govern the formation of, impose restrictions or requirements on, confer special powers, privileges or authorities on, or fix special procedures or methods for, special categories of LLCs, then to the extent such provisions are inconsistent with or different from chapters 201-248 of this title, such provisions shall prevail.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of corporate campaign contribution prohibitions to limited liability companies, OAG 98-053, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (3/2/98).